test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sual_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - suâl a-stem saari: # Noun - full paradigm
     suâl+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: suâl
     suâl+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: suõllu
     suâl+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: suõllu
     suâl+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: [suâllǥa, suâllʼja]
     suâl+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: [suõllust, suâllʼjest]
     suâl+N+Sg+Com+Indef: [suõlluin, suâllʼjin]
     suâl+N+Ess+Indef: suâlan
     suâl+N+Par+Indef: suõllud
     suâl+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [suõllutaa, suõllutää]
     suâl+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: suõllu
     suâl+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: suõllui
     suâl+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: suõlluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: suõlluid
     suâl+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: suõlluin
     suâl+N+Pl+Com+Indef: suõlluivuiʹm
     suâl+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [suõlluitaa, suõlluitää]
